Mississippi, session 2026, HB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the City of Natchez, Mississippi, for the purpose of providing funding to defray the expenses of the Concord Avenue Drainage Improvement Project described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............ $ 2,263,275.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be expended to defray the expenses of making improvements that will improve drainage in the project area, including:  removal of existing surface; excavating existing material; lowering existing street elevation; adding granular material; asphalt surface; and adding curb and gutter and drainage pipes to capture storm runoff and move it underground to a natural drainage stream.  The project shall be undertaken in three (3) phases, with the construction cost of each phase being as follows: (a)  Phase I Construction Cost............ $ 829,660.00 (b)  Phase II Construction Cost........... $ 716,807.50 (c)  Phase III Construction Cost.......... $ 716,807.50 TOTAL ...................................... $ 2,263,275.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue the warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.